Nebraska statutes.
Sec.
9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,209
License
revocation; reinstatement; conditions; department; Board of Pardons; duties;
fee.

(1) Any person whose operator's license has been revoked
pursuant to a conviction for a violation of sections 60-6,196, 60-6,197, and
60-6,199 to 60-6,204 for a third or subsequent time for a period of fifteen
years may apply to the Department of Motor Vehicles, on forms prescribed by
the department, requesting the department to make a recommendation to the
Board of Pardons for reinstatement of his or her eligibility for an operator's
license. Upon receipt of the application, the Director of Motor Vehicles shall
review the application if such person has served at least seven years of such
revocation and make a recommendation for reinstatement or for denial of reinstatement.
The department may recommend reinstatement if such person shows the following:

(a)
Such person has completed a state-certified substance abuse program and is
recovering or such person has substantially recovered from the dependency
on or tendency to abuse alcohol or drugs;

(b) Such person has
not been convicted, since the date of the revocation order, of any subsequent
violations of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or any comparable city or village
ordinance and the applicant has not, since the date of the revocation order,
submitted to a chemical test under section 60-6,197 that indicated an alcohol
concentration in violation of section 60-6,196 or refused to submit to a chemical
test under section 60-6,197;

(c) Such person has not been convicted,
since the date of the revocation order, of driving while under suspension,
revocation, or impoundment under section 60-4,109;

(d) Such person
has abstained from the consumption of alcoholic beverages and the consumption
of drugs except at the direction of a licensed physician or pursuant to a
valid prescription; and

(e) Such person's operator's license is
not currently subject to suspension or revocation for any other reason.

(2)
In addition, the department may require other evidence from such person to
show that restoring such person's privilege to drive will not present a danger
to the health and safety of other persons using the highways.

(3)
Upon review of the application, the director shall make the recommendation
to the Board of Pardons in writing and shall briefly state the reasons for
the recommendations. The recommendation shall include the original application
and other evidence submitted by such person. The recommendation shall also
include any record of any other applications such person has previously filed
under this section.

(4) The department shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to govern the procedures for making a recommendation
to the Board of Pardons. Such rules and regulations shall include the requirement
that the treatment programs and counselors who provide information about such
person to the department must be certified or licensed by the state.

(5)
If the Board of Pardons reinstates such person's eligibility for an operator's
license or orders a reprieve of such person's motor vehicle operator's license
revocation, such reinstatement or reprieve may be conditioned for the duration
of the original revocation period on such person's continued recovery. If
such person is convicted of any subsequent violation of section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197, the reinstatement of the person's eligibility for an operator's
license shall be withdrawn and such person's operator's license will be revoked
by the Department of Motor Vehicles for the time remaining under the original
revocation, independent of any sentence imposed by the court, after thirty
days' written notice to the person by first-class mail at his or her last-known
mailing address as shown by the records of the department.

(6)
If the Board of Pardons reinstates a person's eligibility for an operator's
license or orders a reprieve of such person's motor vehicle operator's license
revocation, the board shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the
reinstatement or reprieve. Such person may apply for an operator's license
upon payment of a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars and the filing of
proof of financial responsibility. The fees paid pursuant to this section
shall be collected by the department and remitted to the State Treasurer.
The State Treasurer shall credit seventy-five dollars of each fee to the General
Fund and fifty dollars of each fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash
Fund.

Laws 1992, LB 291,
§ 10;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-669.19;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 304;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 18;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 54;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 102;

Laws 2008, LB736, § 9.

This section (60-6,209
(Reissue 1993)) clearly defines the 15-year revocation as serving as a punishment
and is unconstitutional because it permits a judicial commutation of a sentence
of punishment. Because this section permits the judicial branch to exercise
the power of commutation, a power that clearly belongs to the executive branch,
this section is unconstitutional as a violation of the separation of powers
clause of the Nebraska Constitution. State v. Bainbridge, 249 Neb. 260, 543
N.W.2d 154 (1996).

The law does not grant an absolute right to
defendant to a reduction of a term of revocation, but provides that the period
of revocation "may" be reduced if the provisions of the statute are shown
by the applicant to be satisfied by the preponderance of the evidence. State
v. Packett, 246 Neb. 888, 523 N.W.2d 695 (1994).